Louisiana, session 2026, HB734.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XIII of Chapter 10 of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 38:2320.21, is hereby enacted as follows:
PART XIII. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
§2320.21. Artificial intelligence; public contracts with entities of foreign countries
of concern prohibited
A. As used in this Section, these terms shall have the following definitions
ascribed to them, unless the context indicates otherwise:
Page 1 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system
that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives,
infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that influence physical or
virtual environments.
(2) “Foreign country of concern” means the People's Republic of China, the
Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic People's Republic
of Korea, or the Republic of Cuba, including any agency of or any other entity under
significant control of a foreign country of concern.
B. This state or a political subdivision shall not enter into, modify, renew,
or extend a contract with an entity to provide artificial intelligence technology,
software, or products, including as a portion of or an option to the products or
services provided under the contract, unless the entity provides this state or that
political subdivision with an affidavit signed by an officer or a representative of the
entity attesting that the entity does not meet any of the following criteria:
(1) The entity is owned by the government of a foreign country of concern.
(2) A government of a foreign country of concern has a controlling interest
in the entity.
(3) The entity is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of
business in a foreign country of concern.
Section 2. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 3308, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. THE LOUISIANA A.I. BILL OF RIGHTS
§3301. Short title
This Chapter may be cited as the "The Louisiana A.I. Bill of Rights".
§3302. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, these terms have the following definitions ascribed
to them, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Account holder" means an individual who opens an account or creates
a profile or is identified by the companion chatbot platform by a unique identifier
Page 2 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
while he is using or accessing the platform, if the platform knows or has reason to
believe the individual is a resident of this state.
(2) "Artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system
that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives,
infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that influence physical or
virtual environments.
(3) "Artificial intelligence technology company" means a business or
organization that produces, develops, creates, designs, or manufactures artificial
intelligence technology or products, collects data for use in artificial intelligence
products, or implements artificial intelligence technology.
(4) "Bot" means an automated online software application in which all or
substantially all of the actions or posts of the account are not the result of a natural
person.
(5) "Companion chatbot" means an artificial intelligence system with a
natural language interface that provides adaptive, human-like responses to user
inputs and is capable of meeting a user's social needs, including by exhibiting
anthropomorphic features and being able to sustain a relationship across multiple
interactions. "Companion chatbot" does not include the following:
(a) A bot used only for customer service or for a business's operational
purposes, productivity, or analysis related to source information, internal research,
or technical assistance.
(b) A bot that is a feature of a video game and is limited to replies related to
the video game and does not discuss topics related to mental health, self-harm, or
material harmful to minors or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the
video game.
(c) A stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions as a speaker and
voice command interface, acts as a voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not
sustain a relationship across multiple interactions or generate outputs likely to elicit
emotional responses in the user.
Page 3 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(6) "Companion chatbot platform" means a platform that allows a user to
engage with a companion chatbot.
(7) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an
identified or identifiable individual or a device linked to that individual.
(8) “Material harmful to minors” has the same meaning as defined in R.S.
51:2121.
(9) "Minor" means any person who has not attained the age of eighteen years.
(10) "Operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise makes
available a bot to an individual in this state.
(11) "Pop-up" means a visible notification on the computer, tablet, or mobile
phone screen of a user which is resolved if the user interacts with or responds to the
notification.
(12) "Resident" means an individual who has resided in this state for more
than six months during the preceding twelve-month period.
(13) "User" means an individual who resides or is domiciled in this state and
who accesses an internet website, online or cloud computing service, online
application, or mobile application.
(14) "Video game" means a game played on an electronic device that uses
a computer, microprocessor, or similar electronic circuitry and its own monitor, or
is designed to be used with a television set or a computer monitor, to interact with
the user of the device.
§3303. Rights relating to the use of artificial intelligence
A. Residents of this state are entitled to certain rights with respect to the use
of artificial intelligence including but not limited to all of the following:
(1) The right to use artificial intelligence to improve their own lives and the
lives of family members, fellow residents, and the world at large in accordance with
the law.
(2) The right to supervise, access, limit, and control their minor children's
use of artificial intelligence.
Page 4 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(3) The right to know whether they are communicating with a human being
or an artificial intelligence system, program, or chatbot.
(4) The right to know if artificial intelligence technology companies are
collecting personal information or biometric data, and the right to expect artificial
intelligence technology companies to protect and deidentify that information or data
in accordance with the law.
(5) The right to pursue civil remedies authorized by law against persons who
use artificial intelligence to appropriate the name, image, or likeness of others for
commercial purposes without their consent.
(6) The right to be protected by law from criminal acts, such as fraud,
exploitation, identity theft, stalking, and cyberbullying, regardless of whether
artificial intelligence is used in the commission of those acts.
(7) The right to be protected by law from criminal acts relating to the
alteration of existing images to create sexual or lewd or lascivious images or child
pornography, regardless of whether artificial intelligence is used in the commission
of those acts.
(8) The right to know whether political advertisements, electioneering
communications, or similar advertisements were created in whole or in part with the
use of artificial intelligence.
(9) The right to pursue civil remedies authorized by law against others who
use artificial intelligence to slander, libel, or defame them.
B. Residents of this state may exercise the rights described in this Section
in accordance with existing law. This Section shall not be construed as creating new
or independent rights or entitlements.
§3304. Companion chatbot use for minors
A. A companion chatbot platform shall prohibit a minor from entering into
a contract with the platform to become an account holder or from maintaining an
existing account, unless the minor's parent or guardian provides consent for the
minor to become an account holder or maintain an existing account.
Page 5 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(1) If the minor's parent or guardian provides consent for the minor to
become an account holder or maintain an existing account, the companion chatbot
platform shall allow the consenting parent or guardian of the minor account holder
to do all of the following:
(a) Obtain copies of all interactions between the account holder and the
companion chatbot.
(b) Limit the amount of time that the account holder may interact with the
companion chatbot each day.
(c) Limit the days of the week and the times during the day when the account
holder may interact with the companion chatbot.
(d) Disable any of the interactions between the account holder and
third-party account holders on the companion chatbot platform.
(e) Receive timely notifications if the account holder expresses to the
companion chatbot a desire or an intent to engage in self-harm or to harm others.
(2) A companion chatbot platform shall do all of the following:
(a) Terminate an account belonging to an account holder who is a minor if
the companion chatbot platform treats or categorizes that account as belonging to a
minor for purposes of targeting content or advertising and if the minor's parent or
guardian has not provided consent for the minor to become an account holder or to
maintain an existing account. The companion chatbot platform shall provide ninety
days for the account holder to dispute the termination. Termination shall be effective
upon the expiration of the ninety-day period if the account holder fails to effectively
dispute the termination.
(b) Allow an account holder who is a minor to request to terminate the
account. Termination shall be effective within five business days of the request.
(c) Allow the consenting parent or guardian of an account holder who is a
minor to request that the minor's account be terminated. Termination shall be
effective within ten business days following the request.
Page 6 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(d) Permanently delete all personal information held by the companion
chatbot platform relating to the terminated account, unless state or federal law
requires the platform to maintain the information.
B. In connection with all accounts held by account holders who are minors,
a companion chatbot platform shall do all of the following:
(1) Disclose to the account holder that he is interacting with artificial
intelligence.
(2) Provide by default a clear and conspicuous notification to the account
holder, at the beginning of companion chatbot interactions and at least once every
hour during continuing interactions, reminding the minor to take a break and that the
companion chatbot is artificially generated and not human.
(3) Institute reasonable measures to prevent its companion chatbot from
producing or sharing material harmful to minors or encouraging the account holder
to engage in any of the conduct described or depicted in materials harmful to minors.
C.(1) A knowing or reckless violation of this Section is deemed a deceptive
or unfair trade practice or act pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer
Protection Law, R.S. 51;1401 et seq.
(2) If the attorney general has reason to believe that a companion chatbot
platform is in violation of this Section, the attorney general may bring an action
against that platform for a deceptive or unfair trade practice or act.
(3) In addition to other remedies provided for in this Chapter, the attorney
general may impose a civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars per violation as
well as reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
(4) If the companion chatbot platform's failure to comply with this Section
is part of a consistent pattern of knowing or reckless conduct, punitive damages may
be assessed against the companion chatbot platform.
D.(1) A companion chatbot platform that knowingly or recklessly violates
this Section shall be liable to a minor account holder for up to ten thousand dollars
Page 7 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
in damages, as well as court costs and reasonable attorney fees, as ordered by the
Court.
(2) A civil action for a claim pursuant to this Subsection may be brought
within two years of the date the complainant knew, or reasonably should have
known, of the alleged violation.
(3) An action brought pursuant to this Subsection may be brought only on
behalf of a minor account holder.
E. For purposes of bringing an action in accordance with this Section, a
companion chatbot platform that allows a minor account holder in this state to create
an account on the platform is considered to be both engaged in substantial and not
isolated activities within this state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or
carrying on a business and doing business in this state, and is therefore subject to the
jurisdiction of the courts of this state.
F. If a companion chatbot platform allows a minor account holder to use the
companion chatbot platform, the parties have entered into a contract.
G. This Section does not preclude any other available remedy at law or
equity.
§3305. Consumer protections regarding bots
A. At the beginning of an interaction between a user and a bot, and at least
once every hour during the interaction, an operator shall display a pop-up message
notifying users that they are not engaging in dialogue with a human counterpart.
B.(1) A violation of this Section is deemed a deceptive or unfair trade
practice or act pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law,
R.S. 51;1401 et seq. and may be enforced by the attorney general on behalf of a user
of a bot.
(2) If the attorney general has reason to believe that an operator is in
violation of this Section, the attorney general may bring an action against the
operator for a deceptive or unfair trade practice or act.
Page 8 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(3) In addition to any other remedy provided for in this Chapter, the attorney
general may impose a civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars per violation plus
reasonable attorney fees and court costs as ordered by the court.
C. This Section does not preclude any other available remedy at law or
equity.
D. For purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this Section, a person who
meets the definition of an operator who owns, operates, or otherwise makes available
a bot to individuals in this state is considered to be both engaged in substantial and
not isolated activities within this state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or
carrying on a business, and doing business in this state, and is therefore subject to the
jurisdiction of the courts of this state.
§3306. Consumer protections regarding deidentified data
A. An artificial intelligence technology company shall not sell or disclose
personal information of users unless the information is deidentified data except as
required by the laws of this state or of the United States.
B. An artificial intelligence technology company in possession of
deidentified data shall do all of the following:
(1) Take reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated
with an individual.
(2) Maintain and use the data in deidentified form.
(3) Contractually obligate a recipient of the deidentified data to comply with
this Section.
(4) Implement business processes to prevent the inadvertent release of
deidentified data.
C.(1) A violation of this Section is deemed a deceptive or unfair trade
practice or act pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law,
R.S. 51;1401 et seq., and may be enforced by the attorney general.
(2) If the attorney general has reason to believe that an artificial intelligence
technology company is in violation of this Section, the attorney general may bring
Page 9 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
an action against the artificial intelligence technology company for a deceptive or
unfair trade practice or act.
(3) In addition to any other remedy provided for in this Chapter, the attorney
general may collect a civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars per violation and
reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
D. For purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this Section, a person who
meets the definition of an artificial intelligence technology company that produces,
develops, creates, designs, or manufactures artificial intelligence technology or
products, collects data for use in artificial intelligence products, or implements
artificial intelligence technology in this state is considered to be both engaged in
substantial and not isolated activities within this state and operating, conducting,
engaging in, or carrying on a business, and doing business in this state, and is
therefore subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.
§3307. Investigations
A. If, by his own inquiry or as a result of complaints, the attorney general
has reason to believe that a person has engaged in, or is engaging in, a practice or an
act that violates this Chapter, the attorney general may administer oaths and
affirmations, subpoena witnesses or matter, and collect evidence. Within five days,
excluding weekends and legal holidays, after service of a subpoena or at any time
before the return date specified in the subpoena, whichever time period is longer, the
person served shall file in the district court of the parish in which it resides or in
which it transacts business and serve upon the enforcing authority a petition for an
order modifying or setting aside the subpoena. The petitioner shall raise any
objection or privilege that would be available upon service of a subpoena in a civil
action. The subpoena shall inform the party served of the party's rights under this
Subsection.
B. If the matter that the attorney general seeks to obtain by subpoena is
located outside this state, the person subpoenaed shall make the matter available to
the attorney general or his representative at the place where the person is located.
Page 10 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
The attorney general may designate representatives, including officials of the state
in which the matter is located, to inspect the matter on his behalf and may respond
to similar requests from officials of other states.
C. Upon the failure of a person, without lawful excuse, to obey a subpoena
and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected, the attorney general may apply
to the district court for an order compelling compliance.
D. The attorney general may request that a person who refuses to comply
with a subpoena on the grounds that the testimony or matter is self-incriminating be
ordered by the court to provide that testimony or matter. Except in a prosecution for
perjury, a person who complies with a court order to provide testimony or matter
after asserting a valid privilege against self-incrimination shall not have that
testimony or matter used against him in any criminal investigation or proceeding.
E. A person upon whom a subpoena is served pursuant to this part shall
comply with its terms unless otherwise provided by order of the court. A person who
fails to appear, with the intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance in whole or in
part with an investigation under this part, or who removes from any place, conceals,
withholds, mutilates, alters, or destroys, or by any other means falsifies any
documentary material in the possession, custody, or control of a person subject to a
subpoena, or who knowingly conceals relevant information with the intent to avoid,
evade, or prevent compliance, is liable for a civil penalty of not more than five
thousand dollars per week in violation, reasonable attorney fees, and costs.
§3308. Unauthorized publication of name, image, or likeness
A. As used in this Section, the term:
(1) "Generative artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that
can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, emulate the structure and
characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including
images, videos, audio, text, and other digital content.
Page 11 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(2) "Person" has the same meaning as in Civil Code Article 24 but also
includes a government or a governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or
public corporation.
(3) "Servicemember" means a person serving as a member of the United
States Armed Forces on active duty or state active duty or a member of the Louisiana
National Guard or United States Reserve Forces.
(4) "Surviving children" means an individual's immediate offspring and any
children legally adopted by the individual.
(5) "Surviving spouse" means an individual's surviving spouse under the law
of the individual's domicile at the time of the individual's death, regardless of
whether the spouse later remarries.
B. A person shall not publish, print, display, or otherwise publicly use for
trade or for any commercial or advertising purpose the name, portrait, photograph,
image, or other likeness of an individual created through generative artificial
intelligence without the express written or oral consent to such use given by any of
the following:
(1) The individual.
(2) Any other person authorized in writing by the individual to license the
commercial use of the individual's name, image, or likeness.
(3) If the individual is deceased, express consent of one of the following:
(a) A person authorized in writing to license the commercial use of the
deceased individual's name, image, or likeness.
(b) If no person is authorized in accordance with Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, any one individual from a class composed of the deceased individual's
surviving spouse and surviving children. A legal parent or guardian may give
consent on behalf of a minor surviving child.
C. A person shall not publish, print, display, or otherwise publicly use for
purposes of trade or for any commercial or advertising purpose the name, portrait,
Page 12 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
photograph, image, or other likeness of an individual without the express written or
oral consent to such use given by any of the following:
(1) The individual.
(2) Any other person authorized in writing by the individual to license the
commercial use of the individual's name, image, or likeness.
(3) If the individual is deceased, express consent of one of the following:
(a) A person authorized in writing to license the commercial use of the
deceased individual's name, image, or likeness.
(b) If no person is authorized in accordance with Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, any one individual from a class composed of the deceased individual's
surviving spouse and surviving children. A legal parent or guardian may give
consent on behalf of a minor surviving child.
D. If the consent required in Subsections B or C of this Section is not
obtained, the individual whose name, portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness
is used, or a person authorized by the individual in writing to license the commercial
use of the individual's name, image, or likeness, or, if the individual whose likeness
is used is deceased, a person having the right to give consent, as provided in
Subsection B or C of this Section, may bring an action to enjoin the unauthorized
publication, printing, display, or other public use and to recover damages for any loss
or injury resulting from the unauthorized publication, including an amount that
would have been a reasonable royalty, and punitive or exemplary damages.
E. If a person uses the name, portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness
of a servicemember without obtaining the consent required in Subsections B or C of
this Section and the use is not subject to an exception listed in this Section, the court
may impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars per violation in addition to
the civil remedies contained in Subsection D of this Section. Each commercial
transaction constitutes a violation under this Section.
F. This Section does not apply to any of the following:
Page 13 of 18
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 734
(1) The publication, printing, display, or use of the name, image, or likeness
of an individual in a newspaper, magazine, book, news broadcast or telecast, or other
news medium or publication if used as part of a bona fide news report or presentation
having a current and legitimate public interest and if the name, image, or likeness is
not used for advertising purposes.
(2) The use of an individual's name, portrait, photograph, image, or other
likeness in connection with the resale or other distribution of literary, musical, or
artistic productions or other articles of merchandise or property with the individual's
consent on or in connection with the initial sale or distribution of the productions,
articles, or merchandise.
(3) A photograph of an individual solely as a member of the public if the
individual is not named or otherwise identified in or in connection with the use of the
photograph.
G. No action shall be brought under this Section by reason of a publication,
printing, display, or other public use of the name, image, or likeness of an individual
occurring more than forty years after the death of the individual.
H. The remedies in this Section are in addition to and not in limitation of the
remedies and rights of any person under the law against the invasion of his privacy.
Section 3. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026; if vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall
become effective on July 1, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature,
whichever is later.